Missouri, session 2026, HB3379.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 192.2200, 192.2400, 192.2475, 192.2490, 192.2495, 192.2500,
197.312, 198.006, 198.018, 198.070, 198.073, 198.640, and 208.912, RSMo, are repealed and
sixteen new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 192.2200, 192.2256,
192.2257, 192.2400, 192.2475, 192.2490, 192.2495, 192.2500, 197.312, 197.550, 198.006,
198.018, 198.070, 198.073, 198.640, and 208.912, to read as follows:
192.2200. As used in sections 192.2200 to [192.2260] 192.2275, unless the context
clearly indicates otherwise, the following terms mean:
(1) "Abuse", the infliction of physical, sexual, or emotional injury or harm including,
but not limited to, financial exploitation by any person, firm, or corporation;
(2) "Adult", an individual over the age of eighteen;
(3) "Adult day care program", a group program designed to provide care and
supervision to meet the needs of functionally impaired adults for periods of less than twenty-
four hours but more than two hours per day in a place other than the adult's own home;
(4) "Adult day care provider", the person, corporation, partnership, association or
organization legally responsible for the overall operation of the adult day care program;
(5) "Department", the department of health and senior services;
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3379 2
(6) "Financial exploitation", when a person knowingly obtains control over the
property of a participant with the intent to deprive the participant of the use, benefit, or
possession of his or her property, thereby benefiting the offender or detrimentally
affecting the participant by means of:
(a) Deceit;
(b) Coercion;
(c) Creating or confirming another person's impression that is false and that the
offender does not believe to be true;
(d) Failing to correct a false impression that the offender previously has created
or confirmed;
(e) Preventing another person from acquiring information pertinent to the
disposition of the property involved;
(f) Selling or otherwise transferring or encumbering property or failing to
disclose a lien, adverse claim, or other legal impediment to the enjoyment of the
property regardless of whether such impediment is valid or is a matter of official record;
(g) Promising performance that the offender does not intend to perform or
knows will not be performed. Failure to perform by itself is not sufficient evidence to
prove that the offender did not intend to perform; or
(h) Undue influence;
(7) "Functionally impaired adult", an adult who by reason of age or infirmity requires
care and supervision;
[(7)] (8) "License", the document issued by the department in accordance with the
provisions of sections 192.2200 to [192.2260] 192.2275 to an adult day care program which
authorizes the adult day care provider to operate the program in accordance with the
provisions of sections 192.2200 to [192.2260] 192.2275 and the applicable rules promulgated
pursuant thereto;
[(8)] (9) "Neglect", the failure to provide, by those responsible for the care,
custody, and control of a participant in an adult day care program, the services that are
reasonable and necessary to maintain the physical and mental health of the participant,
when such failure presents either an imminent danger to the health, safety, or welfare of
the participant or a substantial probability that death or serious physical harm would
result;
(10) "Operator", any person licensed or required to be licensed under the provisions
of sections 192.2200 to [192.2260] 192.2275 in order to establish, conduct, or maintain an
adult day care program;
[(9)] (11) "Participant", a functionally impaired adult who is enrolled in an adult day
care program;

HB 3379 3
[(10)] (12) "Person", any individual, firm, corporation, partnership, association,
agency, or an incorporated or unincorporated organization regardless of the name used;
[(11)] (13) "Related", any of the following by blood, marriage or adoption: parent,
child, grandchild, brother, sister, half-brother, half-sister, stepparent, uncle, aunt, niece,
nephew, or first cousin;
[(12)] (14) "Staff participant ratio", the number of adult care staff required by the
department in relation to the number of adults being cared for by such staff;
[(13)] (15) "Substantial noncompliance", any violation of a class I or class II standard
or twenty or more violations of class III standards;
(16) "Undue influence", the use of influence by someone who exercises authority
over a participant in order to take unfair advantage of that participant's vulnerable
state of mind, neediness, pain, or agony. The term "undue influence" includes, but is
not limited to, the improper or fraudulent use of a power of attorney, guardianship,
conservatorship, or other fiduciary authority.
192.2256. 1. When any adult day care worker; advanced emergency medical
technician; bank personnel; chiropractor; Christian Science practitioner; coroner;
dentist; embalmer; emergency medical technician; employee of the department of social
services, mental health, or health and senior services; employee of a local area agency on
aging or an organized area agency on aging program; firefighter; first responder, as
defined in section 192.2405; funeral director; home health agency or home health
agency employee; hospital and clinic personnel engaged in examination, care, or
treatment of persons; in-home services owner, provider, operator, or employee; law
enforcement officer; long-term care facility administrator or employee; medical
examiner; medical resident or intern; mental health professional; minister; nurse;
nurse practitioner; optometrist; other health practitioner; paramedic; peace officer;
pharmacist; physical therapist; physician; physician assistant; podiatrist; probation or
parole officer; psychologist; social worker; or other person with the care of a person
sixty years of age or older or an eligible adult, as defined in section 192.2400, has
reasonable cause to believe that a participant of an adult day care program has been
abused or neglected, he or she shall immediately report or cause a report to be made to
the department.
2. The report shall contain the name and address of the adult day care program,
the name of the participant, information regarding the nature of the abuse or neglect,
the name of the complainant, and any other information that might be helpful in an
investigation.
3. Any person required in subsection 1 of this section to report or cause a report
to be made to the department who knowingly fails to make a report within a reasonable

HB 3379 4
time after the act of abuse or neglect as required in such subsection is guilty of a class A
misdemeanor.
4. In addition to the penalties imposed by this section, any adult day care
provider who knowingly conceals any act of abuse or neglect resulting in death or
serious physical injury, as defined in section 556.061, is guilty of a class E felony.
5. In addition to those persons required to report under subsection 1 of this
section, any other person having reasonable cause to believe that a participant has been
abused or neglected may report such information to the department.
6. Upon receipt of a report, the department shall initiate an investigation within
twenty-four hours and, as soon as possible during the course of the investigation, shall
notify the participant's next of kin or responsible party of the report and the
investigation and further notify the person whether the report was substantiated or
unsubstantiated unless such person is the alleged perpetrator of the abuse or neglect. As
provided in section 192.2425, substantiated reports of elder abuse shall be promptly
reported by the department to the appropriate law enforcement agency and prosecutor.
7. Reports, including investigation records, shall be confidential as provided
under section 192.2500.
8. Anyone, except any person who has abused or neglected a participant in an
adult day care program, who makes a report under this section or who testifies in any
administrative or judicial proceeding arising from the report shall be immune from any
civil or criminal liability for making such a report or for testifying except for liability for
perjury unless such person acted negligently, recklessly, in bad faith, or with malicious
purpose. It is a crime under section 565.189 for any person to knowingly file a false
report of elder abuse or neglect.
9. Within five working days after a report required to be made under this section
is received, the person making the report shall be notified in writing of its receipt and of
the initiation of the investigation.
10. No person who directs or exercises any authority in an adult day care
program shall evict, harass, dismiss, or retaliate against a participant or employee
because such participant or employee or any member of such participant's family has
made a report of any violation or suspected violation of laws, ordinances, or regulations
applying to the adult day care program that the participant, the participant's family, or
the employee has reasonable cause to believe has been committed or has occurred.
Through the existing department information and referral telephone contact line,
participants, families of participants, and employees of an adult day care program shall
be able to obtain information about their rights, protections, and options in any case of
harassment, dismissal, or retaliation due to a report being made under this section.

HB 3379 5
11. Any person who abuses or neglects a participant of an adult day care
program is subject to criminal prosecution under section 565.184.
12. The department shall maintain the employee disqualification list and place
on the employee disqualification list the names of any persons who are or have been
employed in any adult day care program and who have been finally determined by the
department under section 192.2490 to have knowingly or recklessly abused or neglected
a participant. For purposes of this section only, "knowingly" and "recklessly" shall
have the meanings that are ascribed to them in this section. A person acts "knowingly"
with respect to the person's conduct when a reasonable person should be aware of the
result caused by his or her conduct. A person acts "recklessly" when the person
consciously disregards a substantial and unjustifiable risk that the person's conduct will
result in serious physical injury and such disregard constitutes a gross deviation from
the standard of care that a reasonable person would exercise in the situation.
13. The timely self-reporting of incidents to the central registry by an adult day
care program shall continue to be investigated in accordance with department policy
and shall not be counted or reported by the department as a hotline call but rather a
self-reported incident. If the self-reported incident results in a regulatory violation,
such incident shall be reported as a substantiated report.
192.2257. 1. Any person having reasonable cause to believe that a
misappropriation of a participant's property or funds has occurred shall report such
information to the department.
2. For each report, the department shall attempt to obtain the names and
addresses of the adult day care program, the employee of the adult day care program,
and the participant of the adult day care program; information regarding the nature of
the misappropriation; the name of the complainant; and any other information that
might be helpful in an investigation.
3. Any adult day care program or adult day care program employee who puts to
his or her own use or the use of the adult day care program or otherwise diverts from a
participant's use any personal property or funds of the participant is guilty of a class A
misdemeanor.
4. Upon receipt of a report, the department shall initiate an investigation and
report information gained from such investigation to appropriate law enforcement
authorities.
5. If the investigation indicates probable misappropriation of property or funds
of an adult day care program participant, the investigator shall refer the complaint
together with the investigator's report to the department director or the director's
designee for appropriate action.

HB 3379 6
6. Reports, including investigation records, shall be confidential as provided
under section 192.2500.
7. Anyone, except any person participating in or benefiting from the
misappropriation of funds, who makes a report under this section or who testifies in
any administrative or judicial proceeding arising from the report shall be immune from
any civil or criminal liability for making such a report or for testifying except for
liability for perjury unless such person acted negligently, recklessly, in bad faith, or with
malicious purpose.
8. Within five working days after a report required to be made under this section
is received, the person making the report shall be notified in writing of its receipt and of
the initiation of the investigation.
9. No person who directs or exercises any authority in an adult day care
program shall harass, dismiss, or retaliate against an adult day care program
participant or employee because such participant or employee or any member of
such participant's family has made a report of any violation or suspected violation of
laws, ordinances, or regulations applying to the adult day care program or any adult
day care program employee that the participant, the participant's family, or the
employee has reasonable cause to believe has been committed or has occurred.
10. The department shall maintain the employee disqualification list and place
on the employee disqualification list the names of any persons who are or have been
employed by an adult day care program, who have been finally determined by the
department under section 192.2490 to have misappropriated any property or funds of
an adult day care program participant, and who came to be known to the participant
directly or indirectly while employed by an adult day care program.
192.2400. As used in sections 192.2400 to 192.2505, the following terms mean:
(1) "Abuse", the infliction of physical, sexual, or emotional injury or harm including
financial exploitation by any person, firm, or corporation and bullying;
(2) "Bullying", intimidation or harassment that causes a reasonable person to fear for
his or her physical safety or property and may consist of physical actions including gestures;
cyberbullying; oral, electronic, or written communication; and any threat of retaliation for
reporting of such acts;
(3) "Court", the circuit court;
(4) "Department", the department of health and senior services;
(5) "Director", director of the department of health and senior services or his or her
designees;
(6) "Eligible adult", a person sixty years of age or older who is unable to protect his or
her own interests or adequately perform or obtain services which are necessary to meet his or

HB 3379 7
her essential human needs or an adult with a disability, as defined in section 192.2005,
between the ages of eighteen and fifty-nine who is unable to protect his or her own interests
or adequately perform or obtain services which are necessary to meet his or her essential
human needs;
(7) "Financial exploitation", when a person knowingly obtains control over the
property of an eligible adult with the intent to deprive the eligible adult of the use,
benefit, or possession of his or her property, thereby benefiting the offender or
detrimentally affecting the eligible adult by means of:
(a) Deceit;
(b) Coercion;
(c) Creating or confirming another person's impression that is false and that the
offender does not believe to be true;
(d) Failing to correct a false impression that the offender previously has created
or confirmed;
(e) Preventing another person from acquiring information pertinent to the
disposition of the property involved;
(f) Selling or otherwise transferring or encumbering property or failing to
disclose a lien, adverse claim, or other legal impediment to the enjoyment of the
property regardless of whether such impediment is valid or is a matter of official record;
(g) Promising performance that the offender does not intend to perform or
knows will not be performed. Failure to perform by itself is not sufficient evidence to
prove that the offender did not intend to perform; or
(h) Undue influence;
(8) "Home health agency", the same meaning as such term is defined in section
197.400;
[(8)] (9) "Home health agency employee", a person employed by a home health
agency;
[(9)] (10) "Home health patient", an eligible adult who is receiving services through
any home health agency;
[(10)] (11) "In-home services client", an eligible adult who is receiving services in his
or her private residence through any in-home services provider agency;
[(11)] (12) "In-home services employee", a person employed by an in-home services
provider agency;
[(12)] (13) "In-home services provider agency", a business entity under contract with
the department or with a Medicaid participation agreement, which employs persons to deliver
any kind of services provided for eligible adults in their private homes;

HB 3379 8
[(13)] (14) "Least restrictive environment", a physical setting where protective
services for the eligible adult and accommodation is provided in a manner no more restrictive
of an individual's personal liberty and no more intrusive than necessary to achieve care and
treatment objectives;
[(14)] (15) "Likelihood of serious physical harm", one or more of the following:
(a) A substantial risk that physical harm to an eligible adult will occur because of his
or her failure or inability to provide for his or her essential human needs as evidenced by acts
or behavior which has caused such harm or which gives another person probable cause to
believe that the eligible adult will sustain such harm;
(b) A substantial risk that physical harm will be inflicted by an eligible adult upon
himself or herself, as evidenced by recent credible threats, acts, or behavior which has caused
such harm or which places another person in reasonable fear that the eligible adult will sustain
such harm;
(c) A substantial risk that physical harm will be inflicted by another upon an eligible
adult as evidenced by recent acts or behavior which has caused such harm or which gives
another person probable cause to believe the eligible adult will sustain such harm;
(d) A substantial risk that further physical harm will occur to an eligible adult who
has suffered physical injury, neglect, sexual or emotional abuse, or other maltreatment or
wasting of his or her financial resources by another person;
[(15)] (16) "Neglect", the failure to provide services to an eligible adult by any
person, firm or corporation with a legal or contractual duty to do so, when such failure
presents either an imminent danger to the health, safety, or welfare of the client or a
substantial probability that death or serious physical harm would result;
[(16)] (17) "Protective services", services provided by the state or other governmental
or private organizations or individuals which are necessary for the eligible adult to meet his or
her essential human needs;
(18) "Undue influence", the use of influence by someone who exercises authority
over an eligible adult in order to take unfair advantage of that eligible adult's vulnerable
state of mind, neediness, pain, or agony. The term "undue influence" includes, but is
not limited to, the improper or fraudulent use of a power of attorney, guardianship,
conservatorship, or other fiduciary authority.
192.2475. 1. When any adult day care worker; advanced emergency medical
technician; bank personnel; chiropractor; Christian Science practitioner; coroner; dentist;
embalmer; emergency medical technician; employee of the departments of social services,
mental health, or health and senior services; employee of a local area agency on aging or an
organized area agency on aging program; firefighter; first responder, as defined in section
192.2405; funeral director; home health agency or home health agency employee; hospital

HB 3379 9
and clinic personnel engaged in examination, care, or treatment of persons; in-home services
owner, provider, operator, or employee; law enforcement officer; long-term care facility
administrator or employee; medical examiner; medical resident or intern; mental health
professional; minister; nurse; nurse practitioner; optometrist; other health practitioner;
paramedic; peace officer; pharmacist; physical therapist; physician; physician's assistant;
podiatrist; probation or parole officer; psychologist; or social worker has reasonable cause to
believe that an in-home services client has been abused or neglected, as a result of in-home
services, he or she shall immediately report or cause a report to be made to the department. If
the report is made by a physician of the in-home services client, the department shall maintain
contact with the physician regarding the progress of the investigation.
2. Any person required in subsection 1 of this section to report or cause a report to be
made to the department who fails to do so within a reasonable time after the act of abuse or
neglect is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.
3. The report shall contain the names and addresses of the in-home services provider
agency, the in-home services employee, the in-home services client, the home health agency,
the home health agency employee, information regarding the nature of the abuse or neglect,
the name of the complainant, and any other information which might be helpful in an
investigation.
4. In addition to those persons required to report under subsection 1 of this section,
any other person having reasonable cause to believe that an in-home services client or home
health patient has been abused or neglected by an in-home services employee or home health
agency employee may report such information to the department.
5. If the investigation indicates possible abuse or neglect of an in-home services client
or home health patient, the investigator shall refer the complaint together with his or her
report to the department director or his or her designee for appropriate action. If, during the
investigation or at its completion, the department has reasonable cause to believe that
immediate action is necessary to protect the in-home services client or home health patient
from abuse or neglect, the department or the local prosecuting attorney may, or the attorney
general upon request of the department shall, file a petition for temporary care and protection
of the in-home services client or home health patient in a circuit court of competent
jurisdiction. The circuit court in which the petition is filed shall have equitable jurisdiction to
issue an ex parte order granting the department authority for the temporary care and
protection of the in-home services client or home health patient, for a period not to exceed
thirty days.
6. Reports, including investigation records, shall be confidential, as provided under
section 192.2500.

HB 3379 10
7. Anyone, except any person who has abused or neglected an in-home services client
or home health patient, who makes a report pursuant to this section or who testifies in any
administrative or judicial proceeding arising from the report shall be immune from any civil
or criminal liability for making such a report or for testifying except for liability for perjury,
unless such person acted negligently, recklessly, in bad faith, or with malicious purpose.
8. Within five working days after a report required to be made under this section is
received, the person making the report shall be notified in writing of its receipt and of the
initiation of the investigation.
9. No person who directs or exercises any authority in an in-home services provider
agency or home health agency shall harass, dismiss or retaliate against an in-home services
client or home health patient, or an in-home services employee or a home health agency
employee because he or she or any member of his or her family has made a report of any
violation or suspected violation of laws, standards or regulations applying to the in-home
services provider agency or home health agency or any in-home services employee or home
health agency employee which he or she has reasonable cause to believe has been committed
or has occurred.
10. Any person who abuses or neglects an in-home services client or home health
patient is subject to criminal prosecution under section 565.184. If such person is an in-home
services employee and has been found guilty by a court, and if the supervising in-home
services provider willfully and knowingly failed to report known abuse by such employee to
the department, the supervising in-home services provider may be subject to administrative
penalties of one thousand dollars per violation to be collected by the department and the
money received therefor shall be paid to the director of revenue and deposited in the state
treasury to the credit of the general revenue fund. Any in-home services provider which has
had administrative penalties imposed by the department or which has had its contract
terminated may seek an administrative review of the department's action pursuant to chapter
621. Any decision of the administrative hearing commission may be appealed to the circuit
court in the county where the violation occurred for a trial de novo. For purposes of this
subsection, the term "violation" means a determination of guilt by a court.
11. The department shall establish a quality assurance and supervision process for
clients that requires an in-home services provider agency to conduct random visits to verify
compliance with program standards and verify the accuracy of records kept by an in-home
services employee.
12. The department shall maintain the employee disqualification list and place on the
employee disqualification list the names of any persons who have been finally determined by
the department, pursuant to section 192.2490, to have recklessly, knowingly or purposely
abused or neglected an in-home services client or home health patient while employed by an

HB 3379 11
in-home services provider agency or home health agency. For purposes of this section only,
"knowingly" and "recklessly" shall have the meanings that are ascribed to them in this
section. A person acts "knowingly" with respect to the person's conduct when a reasonable
person should be aware of the result caused by his or her conduct. A person acts "recklessly"
when the person consciously disregards a substantial and unjustifiable risk that the person's
conduct will result in serious physical injury and such disregard constitutes a gross deviation
from the standard of care that a reasonable person would exercise in the situation.
13. At the time a client has been assessed to determine the level of care as required by
rule and is eligible for in-home services, the department shall conduct a safe at home
evaluation to determine the client's physical, mental, and environmental capacity. The
department shall develop the safe at home evaluation tool by rule in accordance with chapter
536. The purpose of the safe at home evaluation is to assure that each client has the
appropriate level of services and professionals involved in the client's care. The plan of
service or care for each in-home services client shall be authorized by a nurse. The
department may authorize the licensed in-home services nurse, in lieu of the department
nurse, to conduct the assessment of the client's condition and to establish a plan of services or
care. The department may use the expertise, services, or programs of other departments and
agencies on a case-by-case basis to establish the plan of service or care. The department may,
as indicated by the safe at home evaluation, refer any client to a mental health professional, as
defined in 9 CSR 30- 4.030, for evaluation and treatment as necessary.
100 14. Authorized nurse visits shall occur at least twice annually to assess the client and
101 the client's plan of services. The provider nurse shall report the results of his or her visits to
102 the client's case manager. If the provider nurse believes that the plan of service requires
103 alteration, the department shall be notified and the department shall make a client evaluation.
104 All authorized nurse visits shall be reimbursed to the in-home services provider. All
105 authorized nurse visits shall be reimbursed outside of the nursing home cap for in-home
106 services clients whose services have reached one hundred percent of the average statewide
107 charge for care and treatment in an intermediate care facility, provided that the services have
108 been preauthorized by the department.
109 15. All in-home services clients shall be advised of their rights by the department or
110 the department's designee at the initial evaluation. The rights shall include, but not be limited
111 to, the right to call the department for any reason, including dissatisfaction with the provider
112 or services. The department may contract for services relating to receiving such complaints.
113 The department shall establish a process to receive such nonabuse and neglect calls other than
114 the elder abuse and neglect hotline.
115 16. Subject to appropriations, all nurse visits authorized in sections 192.2400 to
116 192.2475 shall be reimbursed to the in-home services provider agency.

HB 3379 12
192.2490. 1. After an investigation and a determination has been made to place a
person's name on the employee disqualification list, that person shall be notified in writing
mailed to his or her last known address that:
(1) An allegation has been made against the person, the substance of the allegation
and that an investigation has been conducted which tends to substantiate the allegation;
(2) The person's name will be included in the employee disqualification list of the
department;
(3) The consequences of being so listed including the length of time to be listed; and
(4) The person's rights and the procedure to challenge the allegation.
2. If no reply has been received within thirty days of mailing the notice, the
department may include the name of such person on its list. The length of time the person's
name shall appear on the employee disqualification list shall be determined by the director or
the director's designee, based upon the criteria contained in subsection 9 of this section.
3. If the person so notified wishes to challenge the allegation, such person may file an
application for a hearing with the department. The department shall grant the application
within thirty days after receipt by the department and set the matter for hearing, or the
department shall notify the applicant that, after review, the allegation has been held to be
unfounded and the applicant's name will not be listed.
4. If a person's name is included on the employee disqualification list without the
department providing notice as required under subsection 1 of this section, such person may
file a request with the department for removal of the name or for a hearing. Within thirty days
after receipt of the request, the department shall either remove the name from the list or grant
a hearing and set a date therefor.
5. The director of the department or the director's designee shall conduct any
hearing [shall be conducted] by telephone or electronic means unless the person submits a
written request for the hearing to be conducted in the county of the person's residence [by
the director of the department or the director's designee]. The provisions of chapter 536 for a
contested case except those provisions or amendments which are in conflict with this section
shall apply to and govern the proceedings contained in this section and the rights and duties of
the parties involved. The person appealing such an action shall be entitled to present
evidence, pursuant to the provisions of chapter 536, relevant to the allegations.
6. Upon the record made at the hearing, the director of the department or the director's
designee shall determine all questions presented and shall determine whether the person shall
be listed on the employee disqualification list. The director of the department or the director's
designee shall clearly state the reasons for his or her decision and shall include a statement of
findings of fact and conclusions of law pertinent to the questions in issue.

HB 3379 13
7. A person aggrieved by the decision following the hearing shall be informed of his
or her right to seek judicial review as provided under chapter 536. If the person fails to appeal
the director's findings, those findings shall constitute a final determination that the person
shall be placed on the employee disqualification list.
8. A decision by the director shall be inadmissible in any civil action brought against
a facility or the in-home services provider agency and arising out of the facts and
circumstances which brought about the employment disqualification proceeding, unless the
civil action is brought against the facility or the in-home services provider agency by the
department of health and senior services or one of its divisions.
9. The length of time the person's name shall appear on the employee disqualification
list shall be determined by the director of the department of health and senior services or the
director's designee, based upon the following:
(1) Whether the person acted recklessly or knowingly, as defined in chapter 562;
(2) The degree of the physical, sexual, or emotional injury or harm; or the degree of
the imminent danger to the health, safety or welfare of a resident or in-home services client;
(3) The degree of misappropriation of the property or funds, or falsification of any
documents for service delivery of an in-home services client;
(4) Whether the person has previously been listed on the employee disqualification
list;
(5) Any mitigating circumstances;
(6) Any aggravating circumstances; and
(7) Whether alternative sanctions resulting in conditions of continued employment
are appropriate in lieu of placing a person's name on the employee disqualification list. Such
conditions of employment may include, but are not limited to, additional training and
employee counseling. Conditional employment shall terminate upon the expiration of the
designated length of time and the person's submitting documentation which fulfills the
department of health and senior services' requirements.
10. The removal of any person's name from the list under this section shall not
prevent the director from keeping records of all acts finally determined to have occurred
under this section.
11. The department shall provide the list maintained pursuant to this section to other
state departments upon request and to any person, corporation, organization, or association
who:
(1) Is licensed as an operator under chapter 198;
(2) Provides in-home services under contract with the department of social services or
its divisions;

HB 3379 14
(3) Employs health care providers as defined in section 376.1350 for temporary or
intermittent placement in health care facilities;
(4) Is approved by the department to issue certificates for nursing assistants training;
(5) Is an entity licensed under chapter 197;
(6) Is a recognized school of nursing, medicine, or other health profession for the
purpose of determining whether students scheduled to participate in clinical rotations with
entities described in subdivision (1), (2), or (5) of this subsection are included in the employee
disqualification list; or
(7) Is a consumer reporting agency regulated by the federal Fair Credit Reporting Act
that conducts employee background checks on behalf of entities listed in this subsection.
Such a consumer reporting agency shall conduct the employee disqualification list check only
upon the initiative or request of an entity described in this subsection when the entity is
fulfilling its duties required under this section.

The information shall be disclosed only to the requesting entity. The department shall inform
any person listed above who inquires of the department whether or not a particular name is on
the list. The department may require that the request be made in writing or by electronic
means. No person, corporation, organization, or association who is entitled to access the
employee disqualification list may disclose the information to any person, corporation,
organization, or association who is not entitled to access the list. Any person, corporation,
organization, or association who is entitled to access the employee disqualification list who
discloses the information to any person, corporation, organization, or association who is not
entitled to access the list shall be guilty of an infraction.
12. No person, corporation, organization, or association who received the employee
disqualification list under subdivisions (1) to (7) of subsection 11 of this section shall
knowingly employ any person who is on the employee disqualification list. Any person,
corporation, organization, or association who received the employee disqualification list
100 under subdivisions (1) to (7) of subsection 11 of this section, or any person responsible for
101 providing health care service, who declines to employ or terminates a person whose name is
102 listed in this section shall be immune from suit by that person or anyone else acting for or in
103 behalf of that person for the failure to employ or for the termination of the person whose
104 name is listed on the employee disqualification list.
105 13. Any employer or vendor as defined or described in sections 197.250, 197.400,
106 198.006, 208.900, or 192.2400 required to deny employment to an applicant or to discharge
107 an employee, provisional or otherwise, as a result of information obtained through any
108 portion of the background screening and employment eligibility determination process under
109 section 210.903, or subsequent, periodic screenings, shall not be liable in any action brought

HB 3379 15
110 by the applicant or employee relating to discharge where the employer is required by law to
111 terminate the employee, provisional or otherwise, and shall not be charged for unemployment
112 insurance benefits based on wages paid to the employee for work prior to the date of
113 discharge, pursuant to section 288.100, if the employer terminated the employee because the
114 employee:
115 (1) Has been found guilty, pled guilty or nolo contendere in this state or any other
116 state of a crime as listed in subsection 6 of section 192.2495;
117 (2) Was placed on the employee disqualification list under this section after the date
118 of hire;
119 (3) Was placed on the employee disqualification registry maintained by the
120 department of mental health after the date of hire;
121 (4) Has a disqualifying finding under this section, section 192.2495, or is on any of
122 the background check lists in the family care safety registry under sections 210.900 to
123 210.936; or
124 (5) Was denied a good cause waiver as provided for in subsection 10 of section
125 192.2495.
126 14. Any person who has been listed on the employee disqualification list may request
127 that the director of the department or the director's designee remove his or her name from
128 the employee disqualification list. The request shall be written and may not be made more
129 than once every twelve months. The request will be granted by the director of the
130 department or the director's designee upon a clear showing, by written submission only,
131 that the person will not commit additional acts of abuse, neglect, misappropriation of the
132 property or funds, or the falsification of any documents of service delivery to an in-home
133 services client. The director of the department or the director's designee may make
134 conditional the removal of a person's name from the list on any terms that the director of the
135 department or the director's designee deems appropriate, and failure to comply with such
136 terms may result in the person's name being relisted. The [director's] determination of
137 whether to remove the person's name from the list is not subject to appeal.
192.2495. 1. For the purposes of this section, the term "provider" means any person,
corporation or association who:
(1) Is licensed as an operator pursuant to chapter 198;
(2) Provides in-home services under contract with the department of social services or
its divisions;
(3) Employs health care providers as defined in section 376.1350 for temporary or
intermittent placement in health care facilities;
(4) Is an entity licensed pursuant to chapter 197;

HB 3379 16
(5) Is a public or private facility, day program, residential facility or specialized
service operated, funded or licensed by the department of mental health; or
(6) Is a licensed adult day care provider.
2. For the purpose of this section "patient or resident" has the same meaning as such
term is defined in section 43.539.
3. Prior to allowing any person who has been hired as a full-time, part-time or
temporary position to have contact with any patient or resident the provider shall, or in the
case of temporary employees hired through or contracted for an employment agency, the
employment agency shall prior to sending a temporary employee to a provider:
(1) Request a criminal background check as provided in section 43.540. Completion
of an inquiry to the highway patrol for criminal records that are available for disclosure to a
provider for the purpose of conducting an employee criminal records background check shall
be deemed to fulfill the provider's duty to conduct employee criminal background checks
pursuant to this section; except that, completing the inquiries pursuant to this subsection shall
not be construed to exempt a provider from further inquiry pursuant to common law
requirements governing due diligence. If an applicant has not resided in this state for five
consecutive years prior to the date of his or her application for employment, the provider shall
request a nationwide check for the purpose of determining if the applicant has a prior criminal
history in other states. The fingerprint cards and any required fees shall be sent to the
highway patrol's central repository. The fingerprints shall be used for searching the state
repository of criminal history information. If no identification is made, fingerprints shall be
forwarded to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for the searching of the federal criminal
history files. The patrol shall notify the submitting state agency of any criminal history
information or lack of criminal history information discovered on the individual. The
provisions relating to applicants for employment who have not resided in this state for five
consecutive years shall apply only to persons who have no employment history with a
licensed Missouri facility during that five-year period. Notwithstanding the provisions of
section 610.120, all records related to any criminal history information discovered shall be
accessible and available to the provider making the record request; and
(2) Make an inquiry to the department of health and senior services whether the
person is listed on the employee disqualification list as provided in section 192.2490.
4. When the provider requests a criminal background check pursuant to section
43.540, the requesting entity may require that the applicant reimburse the provider for the cost
of such record check. When a provider requests a nationwide criminal background check
pursuant to subdivision (1) of subsection 3 of this section, the total cost to the provider of any
background check required pursuant to this section shall not exceed five dollars which shall

HB 3379 17
be paid to the state. State funding and the obligation of a provider to obtain a nationwide
criminal background check shall be subject to the availability of appropriations.
5. An applicant for a position to have contact with patients or residents of a provider
shall:
(1) Sign a consent form as required by section 43.540 so the provider may request a
criminal records review;
(2) Disclose the applicant's criminal history. For the purposes of this subdivision
"criminal history" includes any conviction or a plea of guilty to a misdemeanor or felony
charge and shall include any suspended imposition of sentence, any suspended execution of
sentence or any period of probation or parole;
(3) Disclose if the applicant is listed on the employee disqualification list as provided
in section 192.2490; and
(4) Disclose if the applicant is listed on any of the background checks in the family
care safety registry established under section 210.903. A provider not otherwise prohibited
from employing an individual listed on such background checks may deny employment to an
individual listed on any of the background checks in such registry.
6. An applicant who knowingly fails to disclose his or her criminal history as required
in subsection 5 of this section is guilty of a class A misdemeanor. A provider is guilty of a
class A misdemeanor if the provider knowingly hires or retains a person to have contact with
patients or residents and the person has been found guilty in this state or any other state or has
been found guilty of a crime, which if committed in Missouri would be a class A or B felony
violation of chapter 565, 566, or [569] 579, or any violation of subsection 3 of section
198.070 [or], section 568.020, section 565.184, section 566.115, or section 566.116.
7. Any in-home services provider agency or home health agency shall be guilty of a
class A misdemeanor if such agency knowingly employs a person to provide in-home
services or home health services to any in-home services client or home health patient and
such person either refuses to register with the family care safety registry or if such person:
(1) Has any of the disqualifying factors listed in subsection 6 of this section;
(2) Has been found guilty of or pleaded guilty or nolo contendere to any felony
offense under chapter 195 or 579;
(3) Has been found guilty of or pleaded guilty or nolo contendere to any felony
offense under section 568.045, 568.050, 568.060, 568.175, 570.023, 570.025, 570.030,
570.040 as it existed prior to January 1, 2017, 570.090, 570.145, 570.223, 575.230, or
576.080;
(4) Has been found guilty of or pleaded guilty or nolo contendere to a violation of
section 577.010 or 577.012 and who is alleged and found by the court to be an aggravated or
chronic offender under section 577.023;

HB 3379 18
(5) Has been found guilty of or pleaded guilty or nolo contendere to any offense
requiring registration under section 589.400;
(6) Is listed on the department of health and senior services employee disqualification
list under section 192.2490;
(7) Is listed on the department of mental health employee disqualification registry
under section 630.170; or
(8) Has a finding on the child abuse and neglect registry under sections 210.109 to
210.183.
8. The highway patrol shall examine whether protocols can be developed to allow a
provider to request a statewide fingerprint criminal records review check through local law
enforcement agencies.
9. A provider may use a private investigatory agency rather than the highway patrol
to do a criminal history records review check, and alternatively, the applicant pays the private
investigatory agency such fees as the provider and such agency shall agree.
10. Except for the hiring restriction based on the department of health and senior
services employee disqualification list established pursuant to section 192.2490, the
department of health and senior services shall promulgate rules and regulations to waive
the hiring restrictions pursuant to this section for good cause. For purposes of this section,
100 "good cause" means the department has made a determination by examining the employee's
101 prior work history and other relevant factors that such employee does not present a risk to the
102 health or safety of residents.
192.2500. 1. Reports, including investigation records, confidential under [section
198.070 and] sections 192.2256, 192.2257, 192.2475 to 192.2490, 197.550, 198.070,
198.090, 208.912, and 208.915, and any other record or report related to the inclusion of
an individual on the employee disqualification list,shall not be deemed a public record and
shall not be subject to the provisions of section 109.180 or chapter 610. The name of the
complainant or any person mentioned in the reports shall not be disclosed unless:
(1) The complainant, resident, participant, patient, or the in-home services client
mentioned agrees to disclosure of his or her name;
(2) The department determines that disclosure is necessary in order to prevent further
abuse, neglect, misappropriation of property or funds, or falsification of any documents
verifying service delivery to an in-home services client;
(3) Release of a name is required for conformance with a lawful subpoena;
(4) Release of a name is required in connection with a review by the administrative
hearing commission in accordance with section 198.039;
(5) The department determines that release of a name is appropriate when forwarding
a report of findings of an investigation to a licensing authority; or

HB 3379 19
(6) Release of a name is requested for the purpose of licensure under chapter 210.
2. The department shall, upon request, provide to the division of employment security
within the department of labor and industrial relations copies of the investigative reports that
led to an employee being placed on the disqualification list.
197.312. A certificate of need shall not be required for any institution previously
owned and operated for or in behalf of a city not within a county which chooses to be licensed
as a facility defined under subdivision [(22) or] (23) or (24) of section 198.006 for a facility
of ninety beds or less that is owned or operated by a not-for-profit corporation which is
exempt from federal income tax as an organization described in section 501(c)(3) of the
Internal Revenue Code of 1986, which is controlled directly by a religious organization and
which has received approval by the department of health and senior services of plans for
construction of such facility by August 1, 1995, and is licensed by the department of health
and senior services by July 1, 1996, as a facility defined under subdivision [(22) or] (23) or
(24)of section 198.006 or for a facility, serving exclusively mentally ill, homeless persons, of
sixteen beds or less that is owned or operated by a not-for-profit corporation which is exempt
from federal income tax which is described in section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code
of 1986, which is controlled directly by a religious organization and which has received
approval by the department of health and senior services of plans for construction of such
facility by May 1, 1996, and is licensed by the department of health and senior services by
July 1, 1996, as a facility defined under subdivision [(22) or] (23) or (24) of section 198.006
or an assisted living facility located in a city not within a county operated by a not for profit
corporation which is exempt from federal income tax which is described in section 501(c)(3)
of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, which is controlled directly by a religious organization
and which is licensed for one hundred beds or less on or before August 28, 1997.
197.550. 1. Any person having reasonable cause to believe that a
misappropriation of a patient's property or funds has occurred shall report such
information to the department of health and senior services.
2. For each report, the department shall attempt to obtain the names and
addresses of the facility or provider, the employee of the facility or provider, and the
patient of the facility or provider; information regarding the nature of the
misappropriation; the name of the complainant,; and any other information that
might be helpful in an investigation.
3. Any facility or provider licensed under this chapter or facility employee who
puts to his or her own use or the use of the facility or provider or otherwise diverts from
the patient's use any personal property or funds of the patient is guilty of a class A
misdemeanor.

HB 3379 20
4. Upon receipt of a report, the department shall initiate an investigation and
report information gained from such investigation to appropriate law enforcement
authorities.
5. If the investigation indicates probable misappropriation of property or funds
of a patient, the investigator shall refer the complaint together with the investigator's
report to the department director or the director's designee for appropriate action.
6. Reports, including investigation records, shall be confidential as provided
under section 192.2500.
7. Anyone, except any person participating in or benefiting from the
misappropriation of funds, who makes a report under this section or who testifies in
any administrative or judicial proceeding arising from the report shall be immune from
any civil or criminal liability for making such a report or for testifying except for
liability for perjury unless such person acted negligently, recklessly, in bad faith, or with
malicious purpose.
8. Within five working days after a report required to be made under this section
is received, the person making the report shall be notified in writing of its receipt and of
the initiation of the investigation.
9. No person who directs or exercises any authority in a facility or provider
licensed under this chapter shall harass, dismiss, or retaliate against a patient or
employee because such patient or employee or any member of the patient's family has
made a report of any violation or suspected violation of laws, ordinances, or regulations
applying to the facility, provider, or any employee that the patient, the patient's family,
or the employee has reasonable cause to believe has been committed or has occurred.
10. The department shall maintain the employee disqualification list and place
on the employee disqualification list the names of any persons who are or have been
employed by a facility or provider licensed under this chapter, who have been finally
determined by the department under section 192.2490 to have misappropriated any
property or funds of a patient, and who came to be known to the patient directly or
indirectly while employed by the facility or provider.
198.006. As used in sections 198.003 to 198.186, unless the context clearly indicates
otherwise, the following terms mean:
(1) "Abuse", the infliction of physical, sexual, or emotional injury or harm including,
but not limited to, financial exploitation by any person, firm, or corporation;
(2) "Activities of daily living" or "ADL", one or more of the following activities of
daily living:
(a) Eating;
(b) Dressing;

HB 3379 21
(c) Bathing;
(d) Toileting;
(e) Transferring; and
(f) Walking;
(3) "Administrator", the person who is in general administrative charge of a facility;
(4) "Affiliate":
(a) With respect to a partnership, each partner thereof;
(b) With respect to a limited partnership, the general partner and each limited partner
with an interest of five percent or more in the limited partnership;
(c) With respect to a corporation, each person who owns, holds or has the power to
vote five percent or more of any class of securities issued by the corporation, and each officer
and director;
(d) With respect to a natural person, any parent, child, sibling, or spouse of that
person;
(5) "Appropriately trained and qualified individual", an individual who is licensed or
registered with the state of Missouri in a health care-related field or an individual with a
degree in a health care-related field or an individual with a degree in a health care, social
services, or human services field or an individual licensed under chapter 344 and who has
received facility orientation training under 19 CSR 30-86.047, and dementia training under
section 192.2000 and twenty-four hours of additional training, approved by the department,
consisting of definition and assessment of activities of daily living, assessment of cognitive
ability, service planning, and interview skills;
(6) "Assisted living facility", any premises, other than a residential care facility,
intermediate care facility, or skilled nursing facility, that is utilized by its owner, operator, or
manager to provide twenty-four-hour care and services and protective oversight to three or
more residents who are provided with shelter, board, and who may need and are provided
with the following:
(a) Assistance with any activities of daily living and any instrumental activities of
daily living;
(b) Storage, distribution, or administration of medications; and
(c) Supervision of health care under the direction of a licensed physician, provided
that such services are consistent with a social model of care;

Such term shall not include a facility where all of the residents are related within the fourth
degree of consanguinity or affinity to the owner, operator, or manager of the facility;
(7) "Community-based assessment", documented basic information and analysis
provided by appropriately trained and qualified individuals describing an individual's abilities

HB 3379 22
and needs in activities of daily living, instrumental activities of daily living, vision/hearing,
nutrition, social participation and support, and cognitive functioning using an assessment tool
approved by the department of health and senior services that is designed for community-
based services and that is not the nursing home minimum data set;
(8) "Dementia", a general term for the loss of thinking, remembering, and reasoning
so severe that it interferes with an individual's daily functioning, and may cause symptoms
that include changes in personality, mood, and behavior;
(9) "Department", the Missouri department of health and senior services;
(10) "Emergency", a situation, physical condition or one or more practices, methods
or operations which presents imminent danger of death or serious physical or mental harm to
residents of a facility;
(11) "Facility", any residential care facility, assisted living facility, intermediate care
facility, or skilled nursing facility;
(12) "Financial exploitation", when a person knowingly obtains control over the
property of a resident with the intent to deprive the resident of the use, benefit, or
possession of his or her property, thereby benefiting the offender or detrimentally
affecting the resident by means of:
(a) Deceit;
(b) Coercion;
(c) Creating or confirming another person's impression that is false and that the
offender does not believe to be true;
(d) Failing to correct a false impression that the offender previously has created
or confirmed;
(e) Preventing another person from acquiring information pertinent to the
disposition of the property involved;
(f) Selling or otherwise transferring or encumbering property or failing to
disclose a lien, adverse claim, or other legal impediment to the enjoyment of the
property regardless of whether such impediment is valid or is a matter of official record;
(g) Promising performance that the offender does not intend to perform or
knows will not be performed. Failure to perform by itself is not sufficient evidence to
prove that the offender did not intend to perform; or
(h) Undue influence;
(13) "Health care provider", any person providing health care services or goods to
residents and who receives funds in payment for such goods or services under Medicaid;
[(13)] (14) "Instrumental activities of daily living", or "IADL", one or more of the
following activities:
(a) Preparing meals;

HB 3379 23
(b) Shopping for personal items;
(c) Medication management;
(d) Managing money;
(e) Using the telephone;
(f) Housework; and
(g) Transportation ability;
[(14)] (15) "Intermediate care facility", any premises, other than a residential care
facility, assisted living facility, or skilled nursing facility, which is utilized by its owner,
operator, or manager to provide twenty-four-hour accommodation, board, personal care, and
basic health and nursing care services under the daily supervision of a licensed nurse and
under the direction of a licensed physician to three or more residents dependent for care and
supervision and who are not related within the fourth degree of consanguinity or affinity to
the owner, operator or manager of the facility;
[(15)] (16) "Manager", any person other than the administrator of a facility who
contracts or otherwise agrees with an owner or operator to supervise the general operation of
a facility, providing such services as hiring and training personnel, purchasing supplies,
keeping financial records, and making reports;
100 [(16)] (17) "Medicaid", medical assistance under section 208.151, et seq., in
101 compliance with Title XIX, Public Law 89-97, 1965 amendments to the Social Security Act
102 (42 U.S.C. Section 301, et seq.), as amended;
103 [(17)] (18) "Neglect", the failure to provide, by those responsible for the care,
104 custody, and control of a resident in a facility, the services which are reasonable and necessary
105 to maintain the physical and mental health of the resident, when such failure presents either
106 an imminent danger to the health, safety or welfare of the resident or a substantial probability
107 that death or serious physical harm would result;
108 [(18)] (19) "Operator", any person licensed or required to be licensed under the
109 provisions of sections 198.003 to 198.096 in order to establish, conduct or maintain a facility;
110 [(19)] (20) "Owner", any person who owns an interest of five percent or more in:
111 (a) The land on which any facility is located;
112 (b) The structure or structures in which any facility is located;
113 (c) Any mortgage, contract for deed, or other obligation secured in whole or in part by
114 the land or structure in or on which a facility is located; or
115 (d) Any lease or sublease of the land or structure in or on which a facility is located.
116
117 Owner does not include a holder of a debenture or bond purchased at public issue nor does it
118 include any regulated lender unless the entity or person directly or through a subsidiary
119 operates a facility;

HB 3379 24
120 [(20)] (21) "Protective oversight", an awareness twenty-four hours a day of the
121 location of a resident, the ability to intervene on behalf of the resident, the supervision of
122 nutrition, medication, or actual provisions of care, and the responsibility for the welfare of the
123 resident, except where the resident is on voluntary leave;
124 [(21)] (22) "Resident", a person who by reason of aging, illness, disease, or physical
125 or mental infirmity receives or requires care and services furnished by a facility and who
126 resides or boards in or is otherwise kept, cared for, treated or accommodated in such facility
127 for a period exceeding twenty-four consecutive hours;
128 [(22)] (23) "Residential care facility", any premises, other than an assisted living
129 facility, intermediate care facility, or skilled nursing facility, which is utilized by its owner,
130 operator or manager to provide twenty-four-hour care to three or more residents, who are not
131 related within the fourth degree of consanguinity or affinity to the owner, operator, or
132 manager of the facility and who need or are provided with shelter, board, and with protective
133 oversight, which may include storage and distribution or administration of medications and
134 care during short-term illness or recuperation, except that, for purposes of receiving
135 supplemental welfare assistance payments under section 208.030, only any residential care
136 facility licensed as a residential care facility II immediately prior to August 28, 2006, and that
137 continues to meet such licensure requirements for a residential care facility II licensed
138 immediately prior to August 28, 2006, shall continue to receive after August 28, 2006, the
139 payment amount allocated immediately prior to August 28, 2006, for a residential care facility
140 II under section 208.030;
141 [(23)] (24) "Skilled nursing facility", any premises, other than a residential care
142 facility, an assisted living facility, or an intermediate care facility, which is utilized by its
143 owner, operator or manager to provide for twenty-four-hour accommodation, board and
144 skilled nursing care and treatment services to at least three residents who are not related
145 within the fourth degree of consanguinity or affinity to the owner, operator or manager of the
146 facility. Skilled nursing care and treatment services are those services commonly performed
147 by or under the supervision of a registered professional nurse for individuals requiring
148 twenty-four-hours-a-day care by licensed nursing personnel including acts of observation,
149 care and counsel of the aged, ill, injured or infirm, the administration of medications and
150 treatments as prescribed by a licensed physician or dentist, and other nursing functions
151 requiring substantial specialized judgment and skill;
152 [(24)] (25) "Social model of care", long-term care services based on the abilities,
153 desires, and functional needs of the individual delivered in a setting that is more home-like
154 than institutional and promotes the dignity, individuality, privacy, independence, and
155 autonomy of the individual. Any facility licensed as a residential care facility II prior to

HB 3379 25
156 August 28, 2006, shall qualify as being more home-like than institutional with respect to
157 construction and physical plant standards;
158 [(25)] (26) "Undue influence", the use of influence by someone who exercises
159 authority over a resident in order to take unfair advantage of that resident's vulnerable
160 state of mind, neediness, pain, or agony. The term "undue influence" includes, but is
161 not limited to, the improper or fraudulent use of a power of attorney, guardianship,
162 conservatorship, or other fiduciary authority;
163 (27) "Vendor", any person selling goods or services to a health care provider;
164 [(26)] (28) "Voluntary leave", an off-premise leave initiated by:
165 (a) A resident that has not been declared mentally incompetent or incapacitated by a
166 court; or
167 (b) A legal guardian of a resident that has been declared mentally incompetent or
168 incapacitated by a court.
198.018. 1. Applications for a license shall be made to the department by the
operator upon such forms and including such information and documents as the department
may reasonably require by rule or regulation for the purposes of administering sections
198.003 to 198.186, section 198.200, and sections 208.030 and 208.159.
2. The applicant shall submit all documents required by the department under this
section attesting by signature that the statements contained in the application are true and
correct to the best of the applicant's knowledge and belief, and that all required documents are
either included with the application or are currently on file with the department.
3. The application shall be accompanied by a license fee in an amount established by
the department. The fee established by the department shall not exceed six hundred dollars,
and shall be a graduated fee based on the licensed capacity of the applicant and the duration
of the license. A fee of not more than fifty dollars shall be charged for any amendments to a
license initiated by an applicant. In addition, facilities certified to participate in the Medicaid
or Medicare programs shall pay a certification fee of up to one thousand dollars annually,
payable on or before October first of each year. The amount remitted for the license fee, fee
for amendments to a license, or certification fee shall be deposited in the state treasury to the
credit of the "Nursing Facility Quality of Care Fund", which is hereby created. All
investment earnings of the nursing facility quality of care fund shall be credited to such fund.
All moneys in the nursing facility quality of care fund shall, upon appropriation, be used by
the department of health and senior services for conducting inspections and surveys, and
providing training and technical assistance to facilities licensed under the provisions of this
chapter. The unexpended balance in the nursing facility quality of care fund at the end of the
biennium is exempt from the provisions of sections 33.080. The unexpended balance in the

HB 3379 26
nursing facility quality of care fund shall not revert to the general revenue fund, but shall
accumulate in the nursing facility quality of care fund from year to year.
4. Within ten working days of the effective date of any document that replaces,
succeeds, or amends any of the documents required by the department to be filed pursuant to
this section, an operator shall file with the department a copy of such document. The operator
shall attest by signature that the document is true and correct. If the operator knowingly fails
to file a required document or provide any information amending any document within the
time provided for in this section, a circuit court may, upon application of the department or
the attorney general, assess a penalty of up to fifty dollars per document for each day past the
required date of filing.
5. If an operator fails to file documents or amendments to documents as required
pursuant to this section and such failure is part of a pattern or practice of concealment, such
failure shall be sufficient grounds for revocation of a license or disapproval of an application
for a license.
6. Any facility defined in subdivision (6), [(14), (22), or] (15),(23), or (24)of section
198.006 that is licensed by the state of Missouri pursuant to the provisions of section 198.015
may not be licensed, certified or registered by any other political subdivision of the state of
Missouri whether or not it has taxing power, provided, however, that nothing in this
subsection shall prohibit a county or city, otherwise empowered under law, to inspect such
facility for compliance with local ordinances of food service or fire safety.
198.070. 1. When any adult day care worker; advanced emergency medical
technician; bank personnel; chiropractor; Christian Science practitioner; coroner; dentist;
embalmer; emergency medical technician; employee of the departments of social services,
mental health, or health and senior services; employee of a local area agency on aging or an
organized area agency on aging program; firefighter; first responder, as defined in section
192.2405; funeral director; home health agency or home health agency employee; hospital
and clinic personnel engaged in examination, care, or treatment of persons; in-home services
owner, provider, operator, or employee; law enforcement officer; long-term care facility
administrator or employee; medical examiner; medical resident or intern; mental health
professional; minister; nurse; nurse practitioner; optometrist; other health practitioner;
paramedic; peace officer; pharmacist; physical therapist; physician; physician's assistant;
podiatrist; probation or parole officer; psychologist; social worker; or other person with the
care of a person sixty years of age or older or an eligible adult, as defined in section 192.2400,
has reasonable cause to believe that a resident of a facility has been abused or neglected, he or
she shall immediately report or cause a report to be made to the department.

HB 3379 27
2. (1) The report shall contain the name and address of the facility, the name of the
resident, information regarding the nature of the abuse or neglect, the name of the
complainant, and any other information which might be helpful in an investigation.
(2) In the event of suspected sexual assault of the resident, in addition to the report to
be made to the department, a report shall be made to the appropriate local law enforcement
agency in accordance with federal law under the provisions of 42 U.S.C. Section 1320b-25.
3. Any person required in subsection 1 of this section to report or cause a report to be
made to the department who knowingly fails to make a report within a reasonable time after
the act of abuse or neglect as required in this subsection is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.
4. In addition to the penalties imposed by this section, any administrator who
knowingly conceals any act of abuse or neglect resulting in death or serious physical injury,
as defined in section 556.061, is guilty of a class E felony.
5. In addition to those persons required to report pursuant to subsection 1 of this
section, any other person having reasonable cause to believe that a resident has been abused
or neglected may report such information to the department.
6. Upon receipt of a report, the department shall initiate an investigation within
twenty-four hours and, as soon as possible during the course of the investigation, shall notify
the resident's next of kin or responsible party of the report and the investigation and further
notify them whether the report was substantiated or unsubstantiated unless such person is the
alleged perpetrator of the abuse or neglect. As provided in section 192.2425, substantiated
reports of elder abuse shall be promptly reported by the department to the appropriate law
enforcement agency and prosecutor.
7. If the investigation indicates possible abuse or neglect of a resident, the
investigator shall refer the complaint together with the investigator's report to the department
director or the director's designee for appropriate action. If, during the investigation or at its
completion, the department has reasonable cause to believe that immediate removal is
necessary to protect the resident from abuse or neglect, the department or the local
prosecuting attorney may, or the attorney general upon request of the department shall, file a
petition for temporary care and protection of the resident in a circuit court of competent
jurisdiction. The circuit court in which the petition is filed shall have equitable jurisdiction to
issue an ex parte order granting the department authority for the temporary care and
protection of the resident, for a period not to exceed thirty days.
8. Reports, including investigation records, shall be confidential, as provided
pursuant to section 192.2500.
9. Anyone, except any person who has abused or neglected a resident in a facility,
who makes a report pursuant to this section or who testifies in any administrative or judicial
proceeding arising from the report shall be immune from any civil or criminal liability for

HB 3379 28
making such a report or for testifying except for liability for perjury, unless such person acted
negligently, recklessly, in bad faith or with malicious purpose. It is a crime under section
565.189 for any person to knowingly file a false report of elder abuse or neglect.
10. Within five working days after a report required to be made pursuant to this
section is received, the person making the report shall be notified in writing of its receipt and
of the initiation of the investigation.
11. No person who directs or exercises any authority in a facility shall evict, harass,
dismiss or retaliate against a resident or employee because such resident or employee or any
member of such resident's or employee's family has made a report of any violation or
suspected violation of laws, ordinances or regulations applying to the facility which the
resident, the resident's family or an employee has reasonable cause to believe has been
committed or has occurred. Through the existing department information and referral
telephone contact line, residents, their families and employees of a facility shall be able to
obtain information about their rights, protections and options in cases of eviction, harassment,
dismissal or retaliation due to a report being made pursuant to this section.
12. Any person who abuses or neglects a resident of a facility is subject to criminal
prosecution under section 565.184.
13. The department shall maintain the employee disqualification list and place on the
employee disqualification list the names of any persons who are or have been employed in
any facility and who have been finally determined by the department pursuant to section
192.2490 to have knowingly or recklessly abused or neglected a resident. For purposes of
this section only, "knowingly" and "recklessly" shall have the meanings that are ascribed to
them in this section. A person acts "knowingly" with respect to the person's conduct when a
reasonable person should be aware of the result caused by his or her conduct. A person acts
"recklessly" when the person consciously disregards a substantial and unjustifiable risk that
the person's conduct will result in serious physical injury and such disregard constitutes a
gross deviation from the standard of care that a reasonable person would exercise in the
situation.
14. The timely self-reporting of incidents to the central registry by a facility shall
continue to be investigated in accordance with department policy, and shall not be counted or
reported by the department as a hot-line call but rather a self-reported incident. If the self-
reported incident results in a regulatory violation, such incident shall be reported as a
substantiated report.
198.073. 1. A residential care facility shall admit or retain only those persons who
are capable mentally and physically of negotiating a normal path to safety using assistive
devices or aids when necessary, and who may need assisted personal care within the
limitations of such facilities, and who do not require hospitalization or skilled nursing care.

HB 3379 29
2. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection 1 of this section, those persons
previously qualified for residence who may have a temporary period of incapacity due to
illness, surgery, or injury, which period does not exceed forty-five days, may be allowed to
remain in a residential care facility or assisted living facility if approved by a physician.
3. Any facility licensed as a residential care facility II on August 27, 2006, shall be
granted a license as an assisted living facility, as defined in section 198.006, on August 28,
2006, regardless of the laws, rules, and regulations for licensure as an assisted living facility
as long as such facility continues to meet all laws, rules, and regulations that were in place on
August 27, 2006, for a residential care facility II. At such time that the average total
reimbursement, not including residents' cost-of-living increases in their benefits from the
Social Security Administration after August 28, 2006, for the care of persons eligible for
Medicaid in an assisted living facility is equal to or exceeds forty-one dollars per day, all
facilities with a license as an assisted living facility shall meet all laws, rules, and regulations
for licensure as an assisted living facility. Nothing in this section shall be construed to allow
any facility that has not met the requirements of subsections 4 and 6 of this section to care for
any individual with a physical, cognitive, or other impairment that prevents the individual
from safely evacuating the facility.
4. Any facility licensed as an assisted living facility, as defined in section 198.006,
except for facilities licensed under subsection 3 of this section, may admit or retain an
individual for residency in an assisted living facility only if the individual does not require
hospitalization or skilled nursing placement, and only if the facility:
(1) Provides for or coordinates oversight and services to meet the needs of the
resident as documented in a written contract signed by the resident, or legal representative of
the resident;
(2) Has twenty-four-hour staff appropriate in numbers and with appropriate skills to
provide such services;
(3) Has a written plan for the protection of all residents in the event of a disaster,
including keeping residents in place, evacuating residents to areas of refuge, evacuating
residents from the building if necessary, or other methods of protection based on the disaster
and the individual building design;
(4) Completes a pre-move-in screening with participation of the prospective resident;
(5) Completes for each resident a community-based assessment, as defined in
subdivision (7) of section 198.006:
(a) Upon admission;
(b) At least semiannually; and
(c) Whenever a significant change has occurred in the resident's condition which may
require a change in services;

HB 3379 30
(6) Based on the assessment in subsection 7 of this section and subdivision (5) of this
subsection, develops an individualized service plan in partnership with the resident, or legal
representative of the resident, that outlines the needs and preferences of the resident. The
individualized service plan will be reviewed with the resident, or legal representative of the
resident, at least annually, or when there is a significant change in the resident's condition
which may require a change in services. The signatures of an authorized representative of the
facility and the resident, or the resident's legal representative, shall be contained on the
individualized service plan to acknowledge that the service plan has been reviewed and
understood by the resident or legal representative;
(7) Makes available and implements self-care, productive and leisure activity
programs which maximize and encourage the resident's optimal functional ability;
(8) Ensures that the residence does not accept or retain a resident who:
(a) Has exhibited behaviors that present a reasonable likelihood of serious harm to
himself or herself or others;
(b) Requires physical restraint;
(c) Requires chemical restraint. As used in this paragraph, the following terms mean:
a. "Chemical restraint", a psychopharmacologic drug that is used for discipline or
convenience and not required to treat medical symptoms;
b. "Convenience", any action taken by the facility to control resident behavior or
maintain residents with a lesser amount of effort by the facility and not in the resident's best
interest;
c. "Discipline", any action taken by the facility for the purpose of punishing or
penalizing residents;
(d) Requires skilled nursing services as defined in subdivision [(23)] (24) of section
198.006 for which the facility is not licensed or able to provide;
(e) Requires more than one person to simultaneously physically assist the resident
with any activity of daily living, with the exception of bathing and transferring;
(f) Is bed-bound or similarly immobilized due to a debilitating or chronic condition;
and
(9) Develops and implements a plan to protect the rights, privacy, and safety of all
residents and to protect against the financial exploitation of all residents;
(10) Complies with the training requirements of subsection 7 of section 192.2000.
5. Exceptions to paragraphs (d) to (f) of subdivision (8) of subsection 4 of this section
shall be made for residents on hospice, provided the resident, designated representative, or
both, and the assisted living provider, physician, and licensed hospice provider all agree that
such program of care is appropriate for the resident.

HB 3379 31
6. If an assisted living facility accepts or retains any individual with a physical,
cognitive, or other impairment that prevents the individual from safely evacuating the facility
with minimal assistance, the facility shall:
(1) Have sufficient staff present and awake twenty-four hours a day to assist in the
evacuation;
(2) Include an individualized evacuation plan in the service plan of the resident; and
(3) Take necessary measures to provide residents with the opportunity to explore the
facility and, if appropriate, its grounds; and
(4) Use a personal electronic monitoring device for any resident whose physician
recommends the use of such device.
7. An individual admitted or readmitted to the facility shall have an admission
physical examination by a licensed physician. Documentation should be obtained prior to
admission but shall be on file not later than ten days after admission and shall contain
information regarding the individual's current medical status and any special orders or
procedures that should be followed. If the individual is admitted directly from a hospital or
another long-term care facility and is accompanied on admission by a report that reflects his
or her current medical status, an admission physical shall not be required.
8. Facilities licensed as an assisted living facility shall disclose to a prospective
resident, or legal representative of the resident, information regarding the services the facility
is able to provide or coordinate, the costs of such services to the resident, and the resident
conditions that will require discharge or transfer, including the provisions of subdivision (8)
of subsection 4 of this section.
100 9. After January 1, 2008, no entity shall hold itself out as an assisted living facility or
101 advertise itself as an assisted living facility without obtaining a license from the department to
102 operate as an assisted living facility. Any residential care facility II licensed under this
103 chapter that does not use the term assisted living in the name of its licensed facility on or
104 before May 1, 2006, shall be prohibited from using such term after August 28, 2006, unless
105 such facility meets the requirements for an assisted living facility in subsection 4 of this
106 section. Any facility licensed as an intermediate care facility prior to August 28, 2006, that
107 provides the services of an assisted living facility, as described in paragraphs (a), (b), and (c)
108 of subdivision (6) of section 198.006, utilizing the social model of care, may advertise itself
109 as an assisted living facility without obtaining a license from the department to operate as an
110 assisted living facility.
111 10. The department of health and senior services shall promulgate rules to ensure
112 compliance with this section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section
113 536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in this section shall become effective
114 only if it complies with and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable,

HB 3379 32
115 section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers
116 vested with the general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective
117 date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant
118 of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28, 2006, shall be
119 invalid and void.
198.640. As used in sections 198.640 to 198.648, the following terms shall mean:
(1) "Controlling person", a business entity, officer, program administrator, or director
whose responsibilities include the direction of the management or policies of a supplemental
health care services agency. The term controlling person also means an individual who,
directly or indirectly, beneficially owns an interest in a corporation, partnership, or other
business association that is a controlling person;
(2) "Department", the department of health and senior services;
(3) "Health care facility", a licensed hospital defined under section 197.020 or a
licensed entity defined under subdivision (6), [(14), (22), or] (15), (23), or (24) of section
198.006;
(4) "Health care personnel", any individual licensed, accredited, or certified by the
state of Missouri to perform specified health services consistent with state law;
(5) "Person", an individual, firm, corporation, partnership, or association;
(6) "Supplemental health care services agency" or "agency", a person, firm,
corporation, partnership, or association engaged for hire in the business of providing or
procuring temporary employment in health care facilities for health care personnel, including
a temporary nursing staffing agency as defined in section 383.130, or that operates a digital
website or digital smartphone application that facilitates the provision of the engagement of
health care personnel and accepts requests for health care personnel through its digital
website or digital smartphone application. The term supplemental health care services agency
or agency shall not include an individual who engages, only on his or her own behalf, to
provide the individual's services on a temporary basis to health care facilities or a home health
agency licensed under section 197.415 and shall not include a person, firm, corporation,
partnership, or association engaged in the provision of contracted specialty services by a
practitioner as defined under subdivision (4) of section 376.1575, to a hospital as defined
under section 197.020, or to other individuals or entities providing health care that are not
health care facilities.
208.912. 1. When any adult day care worker; advanced emergency medical
technician; bank personnel; chiropractor[,]; Christian Science practitioner[,]; coroner[,];
dentist[,]; embalmer[,]; emergency medical technician; employee of the departments of
social services, mental health, or health and senior services; employee of a local area agency
on aging or an organized area agency on aging program; firefighter; first responder, as

HB 3379 33
defined in section 192.2405; funeral director; home health agency or home health agency
employee; hospital and clinic personnel engaged in examination, care, or treatment of
persons; in-home services owner, provider, operator, or employee; law enforcement officer;
long-term care facility administrator or employee; medical examiner; medical resident or
intern; mental health professional; minister; nurse; nurse practitioner; optometrist; other
health practitioner; paramedic; peace officer; pharmacist; physical therapist; physician;
physician's assistant; podiatrist; probation or parole officer; psychologist; vendor as defined
in section 208.900; personal care attendant; or social worker has reasonable cause to believe
that a consumer has been abused or neglected as defined in section 192.2400 as a result of the
delivery of or failure to deliver personal care assistance services, he or she shall immediately
report or cause a report to be made to the department. If the report is made by a physician of
the consumer, the department shall maintain contact with the physician regarding the progress
of the investigation.
2. When a report of deteriorating physical condition resulting in possible abuse or
neglect of a consumer is received by the department, the department's case manager and the
department nurse shall be notified. The case manager shall investigate and immediately
report the results of the investigation to the department nurse.
3. If requested, local area agencies on aging shall provide volunteer training to those
persons listed in subsection 1 of this section regarding the detection and reporting of abuse
and neglect under this section.
4. Any person required in subsection 1 of this section to report or cause a report to be
made to the department who fails to do so within a reasonable time after the act of abuse or
neglect is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.
5. The report shall contain the names and addresses of the vendor, the personal care
attendant, and the consumer, and information regarding the nature of the abuse or neglect, the
name of the complainant, and any other information which might be helpful in an
investigation.
6. In addition to those persons required to report under subsection 1 of this section,
any other person having reasonable cause to believe that a consumer has been abused or
neglected by a personal care attendant may report such information to the department.
7. If the investigation indicates possible abuse or neglect of a consumer, the
investigator shall refer the complaint together with his or her report to the department director
or his or her designee for appropriate action. If, during the investigation or at its completion,
the department has reasonable cause to believe that immediate action is necessary to protect
the consumer from abuse or neglect, the department or the local prosecuting attorney may, or
the attorney general upon request of the department shall, file a petition for temporary care
and protection of the consumer in a circuit court of competent jurisdiction. The circuit court

HB 3379 34
in which the petition is filed shall have equitable jurisdiction to issue an ex parte order
granting the department authority for the temporary care and protection of theconsumer, for a
period not to exceed thirty days.
8. Reports, including investigation reports, shall be confidential, as provided under
section 192.2500.
9. Anyone, except any person who has abused or neglected a consumer, who makes a
report pursuant to this section or who testifies in any administrative or judicial proceeding
arising from the report shall be immune from any civil or criminal liability for making such a
report or for testifying, except for liability for perjury, unless such person acted negligently,
recklessly, in bad faith, or with malicious purpose.
10. Within five working days after a report required to be made under this section is
received, the person making the report shall be notified of its receipt and of the initiation of
the investigation.
11. No person who directs or exercises any authority as a vendor, and no personal
care attendant, shall harass, dismiss or retaliate against a consumer because he or she or any
member of his or her family has made a report of any violation or suspected violation of laws,
standards or regulations applying to the vendor or personal care attendant which he or she has
reasonable cause to believe has been committed or has occurred.
12. The department shall place on the employee disqualification list established in
section 192.2490 the names of any persons who have been finally determined by the
department to have recklessly, knowingly or purposely abused or neglected a consumer while
employed by a vendor, or employed by a consumer as a personal care attendant.
13. The department shall provide the list maintained pursuant to section 192.2490 to
vendors as defined in section 208.900.
14. Any person, corporation or association who received the employee
disqualification list under subsection 13 of this section, or any person responsible for
providing health care service, who declines to employ or terminates a person whose name is
listed in this section shall be immune from suit by that person or anyone else acting for or in
behalf of that person for the failure to employ or for the termination of the person whose
name is listed on the employee disqualification list.
✔